lexicon/number-arabic.lexc
! number-arabic.lexc
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!

! This defines Arabic numerals.
! We generate numbers of arbitrary length numerals with
! optional thousand separator and possibly one decimal separator.
! Thousand separator is not allowed after decimal separator. We
! insert special symbols ⟪tSep⟫ and ⟪dSep⟫ here and replace using xfst.
! This makes it easy to (optionally) accept a number of different
! configurations.

Multichar_Symbols ⟪dSep⟫ ⟪tSep⟫

LEXICON Root
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  FirstNum;
<¹|²|³|½|¼|¾>           #;
                        dSep;
                        NumFraction;
!                        NumPercent;

LEXICON FirstNum
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  SecondNum;
                        tSep;
                        dSep;
                        #;

LEXICON SecondNum
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  ThirdNum;
                        tSep;
                        dSep;
                        #;

LEXICON ThirdNum
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  FourthNum;
                        tSep;
                        dSep;
                        #;
                        
LEXICON FourthNum   ! no more thousand separator
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  FourthNum;
                        dSep;
                        #;

LEXICON dSep 
⟪dSep⟫                 dSepCont;
    
LEXICON dSepCont   ! no more separators
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9> dSepContCont;

LEXICON dSepContCont
                       dSepCont;
                       #;

LEXICON tSep    ! now we have to have tSep after every 3 digits
⟪tSep⟫                 tStep1;

LEXICON tStep1
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  tStep2;

LEXICON tStep2
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  tStep3;

LEXICON tStep3
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  tStep3cont;

LEXICON tStep3cont
                        tSep;
                        dSep;
                        #;

% Trivial acceptor for fraction expressions like 1/4
LEXICON NumFraction
< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]+
   "/"
  [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]+ >                 #;
